Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7739.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Sections 37-24-2, 37-24-3, 37-24-4, 37-24-5 and 37-24-6 of the General
Laws in Chapter 37-24 entitled "The Green Buildings Act" are hereby amended to read as follows:
37-24-2. Legislative findings.
It is hereby found and declared as follows:
(1) Energy costs for public buildings and public projects are skyrocketing and will likely
continue to increase.
(2) Energy use by public buildings and public projects contributes substantially to the
problems of pollution and global warming.
(3) Public buildings, public structures, public real property and public projects can be built,
renovated, and located using high-performance methods that are resilient, sustainable and
regenerative; that save and generate energy; that reduce and conserve our waters and water
consumption; that foster the appropriate use of our lands and buildings; that improve indoor air and
environmental quality; that improve water quality; that reduce transportation demand and
emissions; that preserve the environment; that make workers and students more productive; and
that improve the quality of our individual and shared human experience and environmental justice
for all citizens of the state, creating a working continuum of ecology embracing and enhancing the
very places and experiences of Rhode Island 's heritage, its people, all life, communities, lands, air
and waters.
(4) The green buildings act is a strategic tool to achieve the greenhouse gas emission

reduction targets and other objectives of chapter 6.2 of title 42 ("2021 act on climate") and the work
of the executive climate change coordinating council established in § 42-6.2-1.
(5) This law is necessary to more efficiently spend public funds.
37-24-3. Definitions.
For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:
(1) "Construction" means the design and construction process of involved for any new
building, or for the renovation and altering, repairing, improving, or and/or demolishing forty
percent (40%) twenty percent (20%) or more of any public structures, public buildings, public real
property or other public improvements of any kind to any public structures, public buildings or
public real property that are governed by the threshold requirements of "public major facility
projects" as defined in this section.
(2) "Department", when used without a specific department name, means the department
of administration state building office, building code commission of the Rhode Island department
of business regulation, or any subsequently identified successor to the above "department", or any
other subsequently named "department" or any other entity of the state. The department through
the state building office, building code commission shall provide staff, other administrative support
services, and funding to the green buildings act commission, and shall provide consultation to, and
with, the green buildings act commission in order to implement the green buildings act.
(3) "Equivalent standard" means a high-performance green building standard, other than
LEED certified standard, LEED for Neighborhood Development certified standard, and SITES
certified standard, that provides an independent, third-party verification and certification of a rating
system or measurement tool, that, when used, leads to outcomes equivalent to, LEED, LEED for
Neighborhood Development, and SITES outcomes, in terms of green building, green infrastructure,
and green site performance; current accepted equivalent standards include green globes, Northeast
collaborative high-performance schools protocol; or other equivalent high-performance green
building, green infrastructure, and green site standards accepted by the green buildings act
commission in consultation with the department.
(4) "Green buildings act commission" means the appointed entity of public and public
agency members, described in § 37-24-5, who shall be responsible for the implementation of the
green buildings act in consultation with the department.
(5) "LEED certified standard" also, "LEED for Neighborhood Development certified
standard", and "SITES certified standard" means the current version of the U.S. Green Building
Council Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) green building rating standard
referred to as LEED certified, LEED for Neighborhood Development certified, and SITES
LC004093 - Page 2 of 10

certified. SITES means the U.S. Green Building Council’s SITES — The Sustainable SITES
Initiative.
(5)(6) "Public agency" means every state or municipal office, board, commission,
committee, bureau, department, or public institution of education, or any political subdivision
thereof.
(6)(7) "Public facility" means any public institution, public facility, public equipment, or
any physical asset owned, including its public real-property site, leased or controlled in whole or
in part by this state, a public agency, a municipality or a political subdivision, that is for public or
government use.
(7)(8) "Public major facility project" means:
(i) A public facility building construction project larger than ten thousand (10,000) gross
square feet or greater of occupied or conditioned space, and its public real-property site; or
(ii) A public facility building renovation project larger than ten thousand (10,000) gross
square feet or greater of occupied or conditioned space, and its public real-property site.
37-24-4. Green building standards.
(a) All public major facility projects of the state, public agencies, municipalities and
political subdivisions shall be designed and, permitted, and constructed to at least the LEED
certified standard, LEED for Neighborhood Development certified standard, and SITES certified
standard, as provided herein, certified or an equivalent high-performance green building standard
approved by the green buildings act commission. This provision applies to public major facility
projects or other public improvements of any kind to any public facility that have not entered the
design phase prior to July 1, 2023, for LEED, LEED for Neighborhood Development and for
SITES.
(b) All public major facility projects of a public school facility, where the project receives
any funding from the state, shall be designed and, permitted, and constructed to at least the LEED
certified standard, LEED for Neighborhood Development certified standard, and SITES certified
standard, as provided herein, certified standard, or the Northeast Collaborative for High-
Performance Schools Protocol, Version 1.1 or above. This provision applies to public major facility
projects or other public improvements by the state or a public school district to any public school
facility that have not entered the design phase prior to July 1, 2023, for LEED, LEED for
Neighborhood Development, and for SITES.
(c) All public major facility projects described in § 37-24-3 (8) and subsections (a) and (b)
of this section, shall comply with this section as a condition precedent in order to apply for and
receive a building permit under section 105 permits of the Rhode Island state building code,
LC004093 - Page 3 of 10

certification under § 23-27.3-128.0, design and construction procedures, and a certificate of
occupancy for that public major facility project in accordance with section 111 certificate of
occupancy of the Rhode Island state building code, commercial editions, shall be required to be in
compliance with this chapter. This chapter shall hereby be incorporated in the Rhode Island state
building code in accordance with RISBC § 23-27.3-100.4 specialized codes incorporated.
(d) All public agencies identified in § 37-24-3(6) shall provide the requested and required
reports and information to the green buildings act commission for all the public major facility
projects described in the statutory requirements of this chapter ("the green buildings act").
(e) A public major facility project does not have to meet the LEED certified standard,
LEED for Neighborhood Development certified standard, and SITES certified standard or an
equivalent high-performance green building standard if:
(1) There is no appropriate LEED certified standard, LEED for Neighborhood
Development certified standard, and SITES certified standard or other high-performance green
building standard for that type of building or renovation project or other public improvements of
any kind to any public facility. In such case, the department will green buildings act commission
shall set green building standards that are appropriate to the project.
(2) There is no practical way to apply the LEED certified standard, LEED for
Neighborhood Development certified standard, and SITES certified standard or other high-
performance green building standard to a particular building or renovation project or other public
improvements of any kind to any public facility. In such case, the department will green buildings
act commission shall set green building standards that are appropriate to the project.
(d)(f) [Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 204, § 1 and P.L. 2022, ch. 205, § 1.]
37-24-5. Administration and reports -- Green buildings advisory committee
Administration and reports -- Green buildings act commission.
(a) The department shall promulgate such regulations as are necessary to enforce this
section by January 1, 2023 green buildings act commission shall promulgate such additional
regulations as are necessary to enforce this section in consultation with the department. Those
regulations shall include how the department green buildings act commission will determine
whether a project qualifies for an exception from the LEED certified standard, LEED for
Neighborhood Development certified standard, and SITES certified standard or equivalent high-
performance green building standard, and shall determine the green building standards that may be
imposed on projects that are granted exceptions.
(b) The department green buildings act commission shall monitor and document ongoing
operating savings that result from major facility projects designed, constructed, and certified as
LC004093 - Page 4 of 10

meeting the LEED certified standard, LEED for Neighborhood Development certified standard,
and SITES certified standard, and shall annually publish a public report of findings, addressing the
legislative findings of § 37-24-2, and recommended changes in policy. The report shall also include
a description of projects that were granted exceptions from the LEED certified standard, LEED for
Neighborhood Development certified standard, and SITES certified standard, as provided herein,
certified or an equivalent high-performance green building certified standard approved by the green
buildings act commission, the reasons for exception, and the lesser green building standards
imposed.
(c) — (f) [Deleted by P.L. 2022, ch. 204, § 1 and P.L. 2022, ch. 205, § 1.]
(g) A green buildings advisory committee act commission shall be created composed of
nineteen (19) seventeen (17) members. The advisory committee green buildings act commission
shall have eleven (11) nine (9) public members and eight (8) public agency members. Five (5)
Three (3) of the public members shall be appointed by the governor; three (3) two (2) of the public
members shall be appointed by the president of the senate; and, three (3) two (2) of the public
members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. One of the public
members shall be appointed by and represent the Rhode Island AFL-CIO. One of the public
members shall be appointed by and represent the Rhode Island league of cities and towns.
(h)(1) The governor, the speaker of the house, and the president of the senate shall make
the following seven (7) appointments representing accordingly as stated with the appointees initial
terms of service:
(i) Governor: one from general construction contracting, three-year (3) term; one at-large
citizen from the urban municipalities of Providence, Cranston, Warwick, Pawtucket, Woonsocket,
or Newport, two (2) year term; and one at-large citizen from the other thirty-two (32) municipalities
in the state, two-year (2) term;
(ii) Speaker of the house: one from architecture, three-year (3) term; one from planning,
two-year (2) term;
(iii) President of the senate: one from engineering, three-year (3) term; one from landscape
architecture, two-year (2) term.
(1)(2) The eleven (11) nine (9) public members of the advisory committee green buildings
act commission shall be composed of nine (9) representatives who are involved in and have
recognized knowledge and accomplishment in their respective professions, of high-performance
green building standards, relating to the standards set forth in § 37-24-4. The public members shall
include one from each of the following fields: architecture, engineering, landscape architecture,
energy planning, labor through the Rhode Island AFL-CIO, general construction contracting,
LC004093 - Page 5 of 10

building product and building materials industries who are involved in, and have recognized
knowledge and accomplishment in their respective professions, of high-performance green
building standards, relating to the standards set forth in § 37-24-4; in addition to two (2) three (3)
additional public members, one public member representing the Rhode Island league of cities and
towns; one at-large citizen public member representing an urban municipality from Providence,
Cranston, Warwick, Pawtucket, Woonsocket, or Newport, and one at-large citizen public member
representing the other thirty-two (32) municipalities in the state in order to ensure geographic
diversity.
(2)(3) The advisory committee green buildings act commission shall have eight (8) public
agency members representing personnel from affected public agencies, and cities and towns, that
oversee public works buildings, public structures, and public real property projects and workforce
development, who shall be appointed by the directors or chief executive officers of the respective
public agencies which shall include the department of administration; the department of
environmental management; the department of education; the department of transportation; the
department of labor and training; the department of health; the office of the state building code
commissioner; and the Rhode Island infrastructure bank, and the Rhode Island League of Cities
and Towns.
(3)(4) The chairperson of the green buildings advisory committee act commission shall be
a public member chosen by the green buildings advisory committee act commission.
(4)(5) Of the initial eleven (11) nine (9) public members, six (6) three (3) shall serve three-
year (3) terms and five (5) four (4) shall have two-year (2) terms. Each appointing authority shall
appoint two (2) public members to three-year (3) terms with the remainder of the public member
appointments serving two-year terms. Thereafter, all public members shall be appointed to three-
year (3) terms.
(i) The three (3) appointees from architecture, engineering, and general construction
contracting shall each have a three-year (3) term of service with a maximum of three (3) terms of
service.
(ii) The two (2) appointees from landscape architecture and planning, shall each have a
two-year (2) term of service, with a maximum of two (2) terms of service;
(iii) The two (2) at-large citizen appointees from the urban municipalities, and the at-large
citizens appointees from the other thirty-two (32) municipalities shall each have a two-year (2) term
of service, with a maximum of two (2) terms of service;
(iv) The two (2) appointees from the Rhode Island AFL-CIO and the Rhode Island league
of cities and towns shall each have a two-year (2) term of service, with a maximum of two (2) terms
LC004093 - Page 6 of 10

of service;
(6) Upon the effective date of this section, the current public members of the green
buildings advisory committee shall continue their service on the green buildings act commission
until reappointed or when replacement appointments are made by the appointing authorities.
(7) The chairperson of the green buildings advisory committee shall be a LEED Accredited
Professional with a specialty in building design and construction (LEED AP BD+C), and shall have
current Rhode Island professional registration in architecture, engineering, or landscape
architecture, and with said credentials shall have the ability to continue as the chairperson for the
green buildings act commission for a maximum of three (3) three-year (3) terms of service in order
to establish the direction and implementation of this chapter across the state and its municipalities.
(8) With, and in, any given appointments by the appointing authorities, there shall not be
appointments made for the public members which would constitute more than one-third (⅓) of the
total nine (9) public members of the green buildings advisory commission. The chairperson of the
green buildings advisory commission shall annually inform the appointing authorities of the
makeup and constituencies of the green buildings advisory commission, and provide
recommendations to that effect.
(h)(i) The green buildings advisory committee act commission shall:
(1) Make all determinations for the implementation of and compliance with the green
buildings act;
(2) Make recommendations regarding an ongoing evaluation process of the green buildings
act to help assist the department and the executive climate change coordinating council implement
this chapter and to achieve the greenhouse gas emission reduction targets and other objectives of
chapter 6.2 of title 42 ("2021 act on climate");
(2)(3) Identify the needs, actions, and funding required to implement the requirements set
forth in this chapter, in achieving high-performance green building projects for our public
buildings, public structures, and our public real properties;
(3)(4) Establish clear, measurable targets for implementing the standards, defined in this
chapter, for all public major facility projects including timeline, workforce needs, anticipated costs
and other measures identified by the green buildings advisory committee act commission and
required by chapter 6.2 of title 42 ("2021 act on climate"); and
(4)(5) Identify ways to monitor and document ongoing operating savings and greenhouse
gas emission reductions that result from public major facility projects designed, constructed and
certified as meeting the LEED certified standard, LEED for Neighborhood Development certified
standard, SITES certified standard, Green Globes, Northeast Collaborative for High-Performance
LC004093 - Page 7 of 10

Schools Protocol, Version 1.1 or above and annually publish a report to the general assembly and
the executive climate change coordinating council of findings and recommended changes in
policy.;
(6) Shall have the authority to establish subcommittees appointed by the chairperson to
further the implementation of this chapter, and the chairperson of the green buildings act
commission shall have the authority to appoint the chairperson and the members of the
subcommittees, whereas each subcommittee shall have at least one member of the green buildings
act commission serving on each of the appointed subcommittees;
(7) Shall have the authority to promulgate rules and regulations for the implementation of
this chapter, and shall have the authority to establish bylaws for the governance of the green
buildings act commission;
(8) Shall collaborate with the executive climate change coordinating council regarding the
implementation of this chapter including, but not be limited to, the establishment of the
benchmarking requirements, technical assistance, building owner needs, outreach and education,
opportunities for funding related to this chapter, the implementation of state policies, programs,
and statutes related to this chapter and recommendations for building performance standards; and
(9) Shall have the authority to identify, pursue, apply for, and receive funding from any
public, private, nonprofit entity or any other organization or private citizen.
(i)(j) All public agency requests for proposals, requests for information, requests for bids,
requests for design/build, requests for construction managers, and any requests relating to obtaining
the professional services, pricing, and construction for public major facility projects by a public
agency for a public facility, shall prominently include the notice of the statutory requirements of
this chapter ("the green buildings act") at the beginning of such requests.
(j)(k) The green buildings advisory committee act commission shall have no responsibility
for, and shall not develop requests for proposals, requests for information, requests for bids,
requests for design/build, requests for construction managers, and any requests relating to obtaining
the professional services, pricing, and construction for major facility projects by a public agency
for a public facility; and the green buildings advisory committee act commission shall have no
responsibility for, and shall not select any vendors for any requests for proposals, requests for
information, requests for bids, requests for design/build, requests for construction managers, and
any requests relating to obtaining the professional services, pricing, and construction for major
facility projects by a public agency for a public facility. Nothing shall prohibit public members of
the green buildings advisory committee act commission from responding to, and being involved
with, any submittals of requests for proposals, requests for information, requests for bids, requests
LC004093 - Page 8 of 10

for design/build, requests for construction managers, and any requests relating to obtaining the
professional services, pricing, and construction for major facility projects by a public agency for a
public facility.
37-24-6. Protection from liability.
No person, corporation, or entity shall be held liable for the failure of a public major facility
project to meet the LEED certified standard, LEED for Neighborhood Development certified
standard, and SITES certified standard or other standards established for the project as long as a
good faith attempt was made to achieve the standard set for the project.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004093
========
LC004093 - Page 9 of 10